fr: papaye rouge
es: papaya roja
it: papaya rossa
nl: rode papaya
pl: czerwona papaja

fr: papaye verte
es: papaya verde
it: papaya verde
nl: groene papaja
pl: zielona papaja

en: candied papaya
de: kandierte Papaya
es: papaya confitada
fr: papaye conﬁte
hr: kandirana papaja
it: papaya candita
nl: gekonfijte papaya
pl: kandyzowana papaja

en: passionfruit, passion fruit, maracuja
bg: маракуя, пасифлора, плод от пасифлора
ca: fruita de la passió
cs: maracuja, maracuji, plodů mučenky
da: passionsfrugt
de: Passionsfrucht, Maracuja, Passionsfrüchten
el: μαρακούγια, φρούτο του πάθους, καρπούς ρολογιάς
eo: pasifrukto
es: maracuyá, fruta de la pasion, granadilla
et: kannatuslille viljade
fi: passiohedelmä, passionhedelmä, kärsimyshedelmä, passionhedelmää
fr: fruit de la passion, passion, fruits de la passion, maracuja
hr: marakuja, marakuje, marakuju
hu: maracuja, passiógyümölcs
it: frutto della passione, maracuja, frutto di granadiglia
jv: markisah
la: Passiflora
lt: valgomoji pasiflora, pasiflorų
lv: pasifloru augļiem
mk: маракуја
ms: pokok markisa
mt: passion fruit
nb: pasjonsfrukt
nl: passievrucht, maracuja, markieza, passievruchten
pl: marakuja, marakui
pt: maracujá, maracujás
ro: fructul pasiunii, fructelor pasiunii
ru: маракуйя, маракуйи
sk: marakujo, marakujová, mučenku
sl: marakuja, pasjonke
sv: passionsfrukt, maracuja
ta: தாட்பூட்
tr: çarkıfelek meyvesi
ur: پیشن فروٹ
zh: 西番莲

en: passion fruit juice, passionfruit juice
de: Maracujasaft, Passionsfruchtsaft
es: zumo de maracuyá, jugo de maracuyá
fi: passiohedelmämehu
fr: jus de fruit de la passion, jus de fruits de la passion
hr: sok od marakuje
it: succo di frutto della passione
nb: pasjonsfruktjuice
nl: passievruchtsap
pt: suco de maracujá, sumo de maracujá
sv: passionsfruktjuice, passionsfrukts

en: reconstituted passion fruit juice, passion fruit from concentrate
cs: koncentrovaná šťáva z maracuji
de: Maracujasaft aus Maracujasaftkonzentrat, Passionfruchtsaft aus Konzentrat
es: zumo de maracuyá a partir de concentrado, jugo de maracuyá a partir de concentrado, zumo de maracuyá procedente de concentrado, jugo de maracuyá procedente de concentrado
fi: tiivisteestä valmistettu passionhedelmämehu, tiivisteestä valmistettu passiohedelmätäysmehu
fr: jus de fruit de la passion à base de concentré
hr: sok od marakuje od koncentriranog soka škrob
lt: pasiflorų sultys iš koncentrąto
sk: marakujová štava z koncentrátu
sv: passionsfruktsjuice från koncentrat

en: pineapple, ananas
ak: aborɔbɛ
ay: Achupalla
bg: ананас
bo: ཐང་འབྲས།
ca: pinya, pinyes
cs: ananas
da: ananas
de: Ananas
dv: އަލަނާސި
ee: Abable
eo: ananaso
es: piña, anana
et: ananass
fi: ananas
fr: ananas
gd: Anann
ha: Abarba
hr: ananas, ananasi, ananasa
hu: ananász
io: Ananaso
it: ananas
ja: パイナップル
kg: Nanasi
la: Ananas comosus
lo: ໝາກນັດ
lv: ananāss
mk: ананас
nb: ananas
nl: ananas
no: ananas
nv: Bilasáana diwozhí
pl: ananas, ananasy, ananasa, ananasów
pt: ananas
ro: ananas
ru: ананас
sd: انناس
sk: ananás, Ananás pestovaný
sm: Pineapu
sq: Ananasi
sv: ananas
te: అనాస పండు
tr: ananas
uk: Ананас
ur: انناس
yi: אנאנאס
za: Bohloz
zh: 鳳梨

en: pineapple segments, pineapple chunks, pineapple rings
de: Ananasstücke, Ananaswürfel, Ananas-Scheiben
fr: segments d'ananas
hr: segmenti ananasa
it: spicchi di ananas

en: pineapple fibre, pineapple fibres
de: Ananasfasern
es: fibras de piña
et: ananassi kiud
fi: ananaskuitu
fr: fibres d'ananas
hr: vlakna ananasa
hu: ananászrost
it: fibre d'ananas, fibre di ananas
nl: ananasvezels
sv: ananasfiber

en: pineapple purée
bg: пюре от ананас
es: puré de piña
fi: ananaspyree
fr: purée d'ananas, pulpe d'ananas victoria
hr: pire od ananasa
it: purea di ananas
nl: ananaspuree

en: pineapple juice
bg: сок от ананас
ca: Suc de pinya
da: Ananasjuice
de: Ananassaft
es: Zumo de piña, jugo de piña, zumo de ananas, jugo de ananas, zumo de piña Gold, jugo de piña Gold
fi: ananasmehu, ananastäysmehu
fr: jus d'ananas, jus d'ananas victoria
it: succo di ananas
ja: パイナップルジュース, パイナップル果汁
lv: ananāsu sula
nb: ananasjuice
nl: Ananassap
pl: sok ananasowy, sok z ananasa
pt: Suco de ananás, sumo de ananás
ro: suc de ananas
ru: Ананасовый сок
sv: ananasjuice
tr: ananas suyu
zh: 菠萝汁

en: concentrated pineapple juice, pineapple juice concentrate
bg: концентриран сок от ананас
de: Ananassaftkonzentrat
es: zumo concentrado de anana, jugo concentrado de anana
fi: ananasmehutiiviste
fr: jus d'ananas concentré, jus concentré d'ananas, jus concentré d'ananas Queen Tahiti, jus concentré d'ananas Comosus
hr: koncentriranog soka od ananasa
it: succo d'ananas concentrato
nl: geconcentreerd ananassap
pl: koncentrat soku ananasowego
ru: Концентрированный ананасовый сок
sv: ananasjuice koncentrat

en: Pure pineapple juice, Pineapple Juice not from Concentrate
de: Reiner Ananassaft, Ananassaft nicht aus Konzentrat
es: zumo de piña exprimida, jugo de piña exprimida
fr: Pur jus d'ananas, Pur jus d'ananas victoria
hr: čisti sok od ananasa
it: Succo di ananas puro, Succo di ananas non da concentrato
nl: Puursap van ananas, Ananassap niet uit concentraat

en: organic concentrated pineapple juice
fr: Jus d'ananas issu de l'agriculture biologique
it: succo di ananas concentrato biologico

en: pineapple juice from concentrate
bg: сок от ананас от концентрат
de: Ananassaft aus Konzentrat, Ananassaft aus Ananassaftkonzentrat, Ananassaft aus Fruchtsaftkonzentrat
es: Zumo de piña a partir de concentrado, jugo de piña a partir de concentrado, zumo de anana procedente de concentrado, jugo de anana procedente de concentrado
fi: ananasmehu tiivisteestä
fr: jus d'ananas à base de concentré, Jus d'ananas à base de jus d'ananas concentré, Jus d'ananas à base de jus concentré
hr: sok od ananasa iz koncentrata
it: succo d'ananas a base di concentrato, succo d'ananas a base di succo concentrato.
nb: Eplejuice fra konsentrat og puré
nl: Ananassap van concentraat
pl: sok ananasowy z koncentratu
pt: Suco de ananás obtido a partir de um produto concentrado, sumo de ananás obtido a partir de um produto concentrado

en: pineapple syrup
bg: сироп от ананас
de: Ananassirup
es: jarabe de piña, sirope de piña
fi: ananaskuorrute
fr: sirop d'ananas
hr: sirup od ananasa
it: sciroppo di ananas
nl: ananassiroop
pl: syrop ananasowy
pt: xarope de abacaxi
ru: ананасовый сироп
sv: ananssirap
tr: ananas şurubu
zh: 菠萝糖浆

en: pitanga, Surinam cherry, Brazilian cherry
la: Eugenia uniflora

en: pomegranate
am: ሩማን
bg: нар
bo: སེ་འབྲུ།
ca: magrana
cs: granátové jablko
da: granatæble
de: Granatapfel
el: ρόδι
eo: granato
es: granada, granadas, romã
et: Granaatõun
fi: granaattiomena
fr: grenade
ga: Pomagrainít
gl: milgranda
gu: દાડમ
hi: अनार
hr: nar
ht: Grenad
hu: gránátalma
it: melagrana
ks: دٲن
la: Punica granatum
mr: डाळिंब
my: တလည်း
nb: granateple
ne: दारिम
nl: granaatappel
pa: ਅਨਾਰ
pl: granat, granatu
ps: انار
ro: rodie
ru: гранатина
sd: ڏاڙهون
sk: granátové jablko
sl: granatno jabolko
sq: shegë
sv: granatäpple
tg: Анор
ug: ئانار
uk: Гранатове дерево
ur: انار
uz: Ahop
za: Maksigloux

en: pomegranate Ruby Red
it: melograno Rosso Rubino

en: pomegranate seeds
bg: зрънца от нар
da: granatæblekerner
de: Granatapfelkerne
fi: granaattiomenan siemen, granaattiomenan siemenet
fr: graines de grenade
hr: sjemenke nara
it: semi di melograno
nb: granateplekjerner
sv: granatäppelkärnor